California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
The boundaries established by the board shall be the boundaries of the division until such boundaries are changed in the manner provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1168.

If the board finds that the boundaries thus established for such division are incorrectly described, it shall direct the county surveyor to ascertain and report a correct description of the boundaries in conformity with the orders of the board. At the first regular meeting of the board after the filing of the county surveyor’s report, the board shall cause to be published, in the manner authorized by section 1196, a notice that the report will be considered at the next regular meeting of the board, stating the day. At the appointed meeting the board shall ratify the report of the surveyor, with such modifications as the board considers necessary. The boundaries established pursuant to this section shall be the legal boundaries of the division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1168.5.

Any landowner whose property is located within the division may file a verified petition with the board alleging that the property will not be benefited by any construction, improvement, or maintenance project proposed to be undertaken by the division.

In such case, the board shall set the petition for hearing. Notice of the hearing shall be published in accordance with Section 1196. If, after hearing all of the evidence introduced at such hearing, the board finds and determines that the property will not, in fact, be benefited by the proposed project to be undertaken by the division and if there are no outstanding obligations owed by the landowner to the division, the board may order the property withdrawn and the boundaries modified accordingly. Thereafter, the boundaries as modified shall be the legal boundaries of the division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------

1168.7.

The board may hold a hearing to determine if any property located outside of a division will benefit from any construction, improvement, or maintenance project proposed to be undertaken by the division.

Notice of the hearing shall be published in accordance with Section 1196. Notice shall also be mailed by the board, at least 10 days prior to the hearing, to all landowners whose property located outside of the division may benefit from the proposed project. The failure to mail any notice, or the failure of any person to receive such notice, shall not affect the validity of any action taken by the board under this section.

If, after hearing all of the evidence introduced at the hearing, the board finds and determines that property located outside of the division will benefit from the project proposed to be undertaken by the division, the board may order the boundaries of the division to be modified so as to include such property. Thereafter, the boundaries as modified shall be the legal boundaries of the division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------

1168.8.

(a) Property may be annexed to or detached from a permanent road division in the same manner and under the same procedures provided in Sections 1162 to 1168, inclusive, for the formation of a division. Any reference to “proposed division” in any of these sections shall be deemed to be a reference to the area proposed for annexation to or detachment from the existing division.

(b) If the board finds that the proposed annexation or detachment should occur, with or without modification, the board may by resolution declare the change to be made and establish a date upon which the boundaries of the division, as amended, shall become effective.

(c) Property annexed to a division in which bonds are outstanding for work performed pursuant to this article shall not be deemed to be property in the division for the purpose of Section 1184.

(d) Property detached from a division in which bonds are outstanding for work done pursuant to this article shall be deemed to be property in the division for purposes of Section 1184 until the bonds are retired.

(e) This section is alternative to any other provision of this article providing for a change in boundaries of a permanent road division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 578, Sec. 5.   Effective August 26, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

1168.9.

(a) The board may order two or more divisions consolidated if the board finds that their boundaries are contiguous at any point or that a consolidated program of construction, improvement, or maintenance will reduce the costs of or increase the efficiency of providing highway construction, improvement, or maintenance.

(b) Property within a division proposed to be consolidated with another division and in which bonds are not outstanding for work performed pursuant to this article shall not be deemed to be property in the division for the purpose of Section 1184 as it applies to the consolidated division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 578, Sec. 6.   Effective August 26, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

1169.

At, or at any time after, the time of forming a division, any 10 or more freeholders thereof may petition the board to have plans prepared for the construction, improvement, or maintenance of all or any part of any highway lying within the division, whether or not such highway is mentioned in the petition for the formation of the division. In the event that there are 10 or fewer freeholders thereof, such petition will be sufficient if it bears the signatures of at least a majority of the landowners within the proposed division and the signatures of owners of more than 50 percent of the assessed valuation within the division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1308.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.

Such petition for construction or improvement shall state if appropriate:

(a) The recommendations of the petitioners as to the materials to be used and the manner of constructing or improving such highway.

(b) An estimate of the probable expense of such work.

(c) A request that the board appropriate for such work a specified sum of money from the road fund of the county.

(d) A request that the board appropriate for such work a specified sum of money from the road district funds of the road districts in which any part of the division is located.

(e) A request that, in order to raise the balance necessary for such work, a special tax be levied or bonds of the division be issued.

(f) A request that annually for the period for which maintenance is proposed the board levy a special tax upon the division in amount sufficient for maintenance and annually appropriate such amount for maintenance purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 801.)
-------------------------------------------

1171.

Upon receiving such petition the board shall cause to be prepared estimates, plans, and specifications for the work mentioned in the petition exclusive of maintenance, and for any other highway or work which the board considers a necessary part of the highway mentioned in the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 981.)
-------------------------------------------

1172.

When it has adopted plans and specifications for such work exclusive of maintenance, the board may set apart therefor from the road fund of the county, and from the funds of any district of which the division is a part, such sums as the board considers equitable.

The board shall not set apart from the funds of any such district less than 75 percent of the sum which bears the same ratio to the whole fund of the particular district as the assessed valuation of that part of the division lying in the district bears to the whole assessed valuation of the district. The board may set apart more than this percentage. The board shall cause the sums to be set apart in a fund known as the “permanent road fund of ____ division,” specifying the division by name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 801.)
-------------------------------------------

1173.

When a special tax is petitioned for, the board shall immediately order an election within the division to determine whether such tax will be levied. The board may submit to the electors at such election the question whether the balance of the estimated cost of the proposed work will be raised by a special tax in one year or spread equally over 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, or 10 successive years and whether the amount annually estimated to be needed for maintenance will be raised by the annual levy of a special tax for the period appropriate to the period indicated in the petition. The electorate at such an election shall consist of the registered voters residing within the boundaries of the division if there are 10 or more registered voters residing within the division at the time of ordering the election or if there are less than 10 registered voters within the boundaries of the division at the time of ordering the election the electorate shall consist of the legal owners of the land lying within the boundaries of such division as shown on the last equalized assessment roll unless proof of transfer of legal title satisfactory to the board is submitted to the board at least 10 days prior to the date of election in which event the transferee shall be an elector in the place and stead of the transferor unless the transferor is the legal owner of other property within the boundaries of the division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 140.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.

The board shall call such election by posting notices in the manner provided in section 1195, and by publishing notice of the election in the manner authorized by section 1196.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1175.

Such notice of election shall contain:

(a) The time and place of holding the election.

(b) The amount of money proposed to be raised for construction or improvement. 

(c) The purpose for which such money is to be used, including a brief description of the proposed work and materials to be used.

(d) Whether it is proposed to raise the amount in one or more years, stating the number of years and the amount to be raised each year.

(e) Whether it is proposed to levy a tax annually for maintenance and for what period any such tax is proposed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 981.)
-------------------------------------------

1176.

For the purposes of this election, the board shall establish, by order, one or more precincts and appoint three judges for each precinct to conduct the election. The election shall be conducted as nearly as practicable in conformity with the general election laws, but no particular form of ballot need be used. To the right of or below the question on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. An informality in conducting the election shall not invalidate the election if it was otherwise fairly conducted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 31.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1177.

The officers of the election shall certify the result of the election to the board, giving the whole number of votes cast, and the number for and the number against the tax. If the majority is against the tax, the money transferred to the fund of such division shall revert to the funds from which it was taken.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1178.

If two-thirds of the votes cast are for the tax, the board shall annually, at the time of levying the county taxes, levy a special tax in the division sufficient to raise the amount voted for the current fiscal year, sufficient to meet estimated costs of maintenance for the current fiscal year, and sufficient to reimburse the county for any expenses recoverable under Section 1197.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 97, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1178.5.

When the levy of a special tax has been authorized, the board of supervisors may advance to the permanent road division the division’s share of the cost of the improvements or the board of supervisors may determine to proceed with such work at such time as the estimated expense has been raised by taxes levied within the division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1308.)
-------------------------------------------

1179.

The tax so levied shall be collected in the same manner as county taxes and, when collected, shall be paid into the county treasury for the use of the division in which the tax is collected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 97, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1179.5.

In lieu of, or in addition to, any special tax levied pursuant to Section 1178, the board may fix and collect parcel charges for any permanent road division pursuant to the assessment ballot procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 158, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1179.6.

(a) In addition to any other authority granted under this article, the board may issue bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness on behalf of a permanent road division or a zone to finance capital improvements for a term of not more than 10 years, to be repaid solely from special taxes or parcel charges levied within the division or zone.

(b) The provisions of Sections 53356.1 to 53356.6, inclusive, of the Government Code shall apply within the division or zone with regard to the collection of the special taxes or parcel charges and to the foreclosure of liens when the board has issued bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness on behalf of the division or zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 179, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1180.

If the petition proposing the work asks for the issuance of bonds of the division, the board shall call an election in such division and submit to the electors thereof the question whether the bonds of the division shall be issued. The board shall call such election by posting notices in the manner provided in section 1195 and by publishing notice thereof in the manner provided in section 1196.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1181.

The notice of election shall contain:

(a) The time and place of holding the election.

(b) The boundaries of the election districts. No election precinct shall be partly in each of two or more districts.

(c) The names of three judges for each election district, to conduct the election.

(d) The hours, which shall not be less than eight, during which the polls will be open.

(e) The amount and denomination of the bonds, the rate of interest, and the greatest number of years for which the last-maturing bonds will run.

(f) The purpose for which the proceeds of the bonds are to be used, including a brief description of the proposed work and the materials to be used.

(g) The signature of the chair of the board, attested by the clerk of the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 122.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1182.

The election shall be conducted as nearly as practicable in accordance with the general election laws, but no particular form of ballot need be used. An informality in conducting the election shall not invalidate the election if it was otherwise fairly conducted. To the right of or below each bond proposition on the ballot, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 32.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1183.

The officers of the election shall certify the result of the election to the board, giving the whole number of votes cast and the number for and the number against the bonds. If two-thirds of those voting on the proposition are in favor of issuing the bonds, the board shall cause an entry of that fact to be made upon the minutes of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1184.

The board may then issue the bonds of the division to the number and amount provided for in the election proceedings. The bonds shall be payable out of the funds of the division, and the money for the redemption of and the interest on the bonds shall be raised by taxation upon the property in the division. The total amount of bonds so issued shall not exceed fifteen per cent of the taxable property of the division as shown by the last equalized assessment roll of the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1185.

The board, by an order entered upon its minutes, shall prescribe all of the following:

(a) The form of the bonds.

(b) The time when the bonds become due, not exceeding 40 years from the date thereof.

(c) The rate of interest the bonds shall bear, not exceeding the maximum rate permitted by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 97, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1186.

The interest on the bonds shall be payable annually. Each bond and each coupon shall bear the signature or facsimile printed signature of the chair of the board and of the clerk of the board of supervisors. The county treasurer shall, after reasonable notice, sell the bonds to the highest and best bidder, but not for less than par plus any accrued interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 123.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1187.

If, at the election on the question of whether or not bonds are to be issued, the bonds are not authorized, the money transferred to the fund of the division shall revert to the funds from which it was taken.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1188.

The board shall cause the highway work provided for in this article to be done in accordance with the provisions of Sections 20391 to 20395, inclusive, of the Public Contract Code, except that the notice calling for bids shall be published in a newspaper published in the division if there is such a newspaper. The successful bidder shall deposit a bond in the amount the board requires, conditioned on the faithful performance of the contract and on the payment for all labor employed and all material used in the work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 290.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1189.

Before opening the bids for doing any work provided for in this article, the board may appoint such inspectors as it considers necessary and fix their compensation, or may proceed as provided in either section 1075 or section 1191. Such compensation shall be paid out of the funds of the division. Such inspectors shall:

(a) Inspect from time to time the work being done under the contract.

(b) File with the board at least once a month reports on the manner in which the contractor is performing the work, setting forth in detail any objections they or any of them have to the manner in which the work is being done, with recommendations as to changes desirable and provided for in the plans and specifications.

(c) State in each report the amount of unsatisfactory work done during the period for which the report is made, and estimate the value thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1190.

The board shall make no payment on account of work which is reported by the inspectors to be unsatisfactory, until the objections are investigated and determined to be unfounded, or until the contractor has performed the work in strict compliance with the plans and specifications.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1191.

In lieu of the appointment of inspectors as provided in section 1189, or in lieu of proceeding pursuant to section 1075, the board may employ an engineer who shall prepare plans and specifications, supervise the work, and perform such other services as the board requires.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.

From time to time as the work progresses, the board may make payments on account, but shall not, before the completion of the contract, pay more than seventy-five per cent of the contract price of the amount completed. The board shall not make final payment until the work is accepted by the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1193.

Any money in the fund of the division, after completion of, and final payment for, the work contracted for, shall remain in such fund and be expended solely in maintaining the highways of that division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1194.

On payment of all debts of the division or on the failure of the division within two years after formation to vote a special tax or bonds for any proposed work, the division shall cease to exist, unless the division also exists for the purpose of maintenance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 97, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1194.5.

A permanent road division formed for the purpose of maintenance that has ceased to exist as a result of the amendments made to Section 1194 by Section 3 of Chapter 1025 of the Statutes of 1969 may be reinstated as an active and functioning division upon order of the board of supervisors adopted by resolution, if the board finds that the necessity for maintenance work within the division continues to exist and any limited period of maintenance set forth in the petition for the formation of the division has not expired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 97, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1195.

The board shall cause the notices, which are required to be posted by sections 1174 and 1180, to be posted at least fifteen days before the election along every highway proposed to be constructed or improved, at distances not more than one mile apart, and not less than three such notices.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1196.

The board shall cause all publications, required by this article, particularly sections 1164, 1166, 1168, 1174 and 1180, in any proceeding or election, to be published in a newspaper published within the division, if any newspaper is published therein. If there is no newspaper published within the division, the board shall cause such publication to be made in a newspaper published within the county and considered by the board best adapted to give notice to the residents of the division. One publication each week for three successive weeks shall be a sufficient publication under this article, the last publication to be not less than seven days prior to the event of which the publication is notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1197.

The expenses of organizing a division, conducting any necessary election, and providing engineering services, pursuant to this article, shall be a county charge payable out of the county general fund. If a division is formed and a tax levy authorized or parcel charge imposed, the expenses shall be recovered by the county from the funds of the division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 97, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. County Bridges and Subways [1300. - 1436.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1300. - 1320.]

1300.

No tolls shall ever be charged for crossing any bridge constructed under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1301.

The provisions of this chapter and of the California Toll Bridge Authority Act shall be construed together, and if the provisions of this chapter conflict with or contravene the provisions of the California Toll Bridge Authority Act, the provisions of the latter shall prevail. Any action taken under the provisions of this chapter shall be taken not only in compliance with the requirements of this chapter but also in compliance with any applicable requirements of the California Toll Bridge Authority Act.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1302.

Nothing in this chapter shall limit or affect the acquisition or construction by the department of bridges upon State highways or of bridges over navigable streams, swamps, navigable estuaries, ponds, or arms of bay.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1320.

A board of supervisors may construct, operate, manage, or maintain summer bridges under rules and regulations, and at the times and places, that it considers necessary. The board shall cause any expenditure with regard to the bridges to be paid out of the county general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 139.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Construction, Maintenance, and Repair [1321. - 1331.]

1321.

All county bridges, not otherwise specially provided for, are maintained in the same manner as county highways are maintained. Such bridges are under the management and control of the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 413.)
-------------------------------------------

1331.

Whenever any county has appointed a road commissioner for all road districts in the county as authorized by Section 2006, or whenever any county has adopted a county charter pursuant to Section 4 of Article XI of the California Constitution, providing for the appointment of a road commissioner as a county officer, and for the organization of a permanent road department for the construction, improvement, and maintenance of highways and bridges, the road commissioner has charge of the construction and maintenance of all county bridges in the county, under the order and direction of the board of supervisors as provided in Section 1332.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 140.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Joint Bridges [1390. - 1404.]

1390.

Any bridge crossing the line between a city and a road district may be constructed and maintained, as provided in section 1391, by the city and by the county from the road fund of the district into which such bridge extends.

Any bridge crossing the line between cities may be constructed and maintained by such cities as provided in section 1391.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1391.

Any bridge referred to in section 1390 may be constructed by contract, let as provided by law, by any city into which the bridge extends, or by the county into which such bridge extends or in which such bridge is located. Any such city or county may contribute toward the expense of the construction or maintenance of such bridge by the appropriation for such purpose of any money in its treasury not otherwise appropriated, upon such terms and conditions as are prescribed by ordinance or resolution of the governing body of such city.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1392.

If the proportion to be paid by any such city or county can not be otherwise determined, the expense of construction or maintenance of any such bridge shall be borne equally by the city and from the road fund of the road district into both of which the bridge reaches, or by the cities into which the bridge reaches.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1393.

The proceeds of any bonds authorized by the voters of any such city or county for the acquisition, construction or completion of any such bridge, or any portion thereof, may be expended or contributed as provided in sections 1391 and 1392.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1394.

(a) Any county may join with any city located within such county in the acquisition, construction or maintenance of any bridge or viaduct within the county, whether such bridge or viaduct is or is to be located within or without any such city.

(b) The expense of the acquisition, construction or maintenance of any such bridge or viaduct shall be borne by such county and such city in such proportion as the legislative bodies thereof determine by resolution or ordinance and may be paid out of any funds available for such purpose.

(c) The authority and responsibility for the acquisition, construction or maintenance of any such bridge or viaduct shall vest in the county or in the city, or in both, as provided in the ordinances or resolutions apportioning the expense.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1395.

Any bridge which crosses the line between counties, unless otherwise specially provided for, shall be constructed by the counties into which such bridge reaches. Each of the counties into which any such bridge reaches shall pay that portion of the expense of the bridge previously agreed upon by the boards of supervisors of such counties, even though such bridge reaches within the limits of a city.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1396.

The boards of supervisors in their respective counties may erect free county bridges on county highways across navigable bodies of water in this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1397.

If a navigable body of water is the boundary line between counties, the boards of such counties may join in the construction of a free county bridge upon the terms to which they agree. In the event of a failure to agree, either county may build a bridge and retain control thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1398.

The board of supervisors of any county may declare that it is necessary for the public convenience to construct a bridge across any body of water or swampland which lies in or extends into the county, and may prescribe the points between which such bridge will be built. Thereafter the board may let any contract to build the bridge, and pay for any such work out of the county general fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1399.

The boards of supervisors of two adjoining counties may enter into an agreement with any person with whom such boards desire to collaborate for the purposes specified in section 1400, if such boards find that any of the following circumstances exist:

(a) That any bridge is necessary for highway purposes over any navigable body of water lying between such counties.

(b) That any existing bridge over any navigable body of water lying between such counties, and used wholly or in part for highway purposes, whether owned by either county or both counties, or used by either or both by agreement with the owner of the bridge, requires, in the interest of commerce or because of lack of repair:

(1) Reconstruction.

(2) Replacement by a new structure.

(3) Relocation at a place on such navigable body of water better suited to the use of the bridge or to the use of such navigable water.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1400.

The agreement authorized by section 1399 may provide for any of the following:

(a) The construction of a bridge.

(b) The reconstruction of the existing bridge or its replacement by a new structure.

(c) The rebuilding of the bridge at another location.

(d) The joint use of the resulting bridge thereafter by such person and the public.

(e) The apportionment of the expense of any bridge work between each of the counties and such person jointly using or to use the bridge. In no event shall either county agree to contribute more than one-third of the expense of construction, reconstruction, relocation, replacement or repair of any such bridge.

(f) The construction and use of the bridge in the manner and upon the terms and conditions agreed upon between such counties and such person.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1401.

Any work done pursuant to such an agreement is exempt from any provisions of law regarding the letting of contracts by counties for the performance of any work upon bridges.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1402.

The board of supervisors of any county now controlling or maintaining, by virtue of any statute, any bridge across any navigable stream, which bridge is wholly or in part within any city, may whenever necessary:

(a) Reconstruct all or any part of such bridge.

(b) Replace such bridge by a new structure.

(c) With the consent of the governing body of such city, change the location of such bridge to a location on the stream better suited to the use of the bridge or to the use of the navigable stream. The board of supervisors may abandon any such existing bridge and build a new bridge at such changed location.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1403.

The board of supervisors reconstructing, replacing or relocating such bridge may enter into an agreement with any person who is then maintaining any bridge across any such navigable stream, for the building of a joint bridge in order to prevent the impeding of commerce on such navigable stream, and to apportion the expense between the county and the person in any manner mutually agreed upon.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1404.

The expense of such reconstruction, or of the building of a new bridge is payable from the same fund provided by law for the maintenance and repair of any such bridge. If the county makes such an agreement with any person for the building of a joint bridge, the county shall pay from such fund only its portion of the cost of the joint bridge, as settled by the agreement. In no event may the county pay more than one-half the expense of construction, repair or reconstruction of any such joint bridge.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Subways [1430. - 1436.]

1430.

For the purposes of this article, “subway” includes tube or tunnel.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1431.

Whenever in the interests of commerce, for the benefit of the residents of the county, or for the purpose of expediting travel between points on opposite sides of any navigable body of water, the board of supervisors of any county finds it advisable to construct for the public use any subway under any such navigable body of water, at a location determined upon by the board, the board shall call an election and submit to the electors of the county the question whether bonds of the county will be issued and sold for the purpose of constructing such a subway.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1432.

The order calling such an election shall be valid and effectual when signed by two-thirds of the members of the board. The election shall be held and the bonds issued in accordance with the provisions of law governing county bond elections and the issuance of county bonds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1433.

The board of supervisors of any county may, for the purpose of ascertaining the probable expense of any proposed subway, expend out of the county general fund a sum not exceeding thirty-five hundred dollars. When any such proposed subway reaches partly into one county and partly into another, such counties shall equally divide the expenditure necessary to ascertain the probable expense of any such proposed subway, but such expenditure shall not exceed in the aggregate the sum of thirty-five hundred dollars.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1434.

Whenever any such subway is proposed to be constructed under any navigable body of water forming the dividing line between counties, the boards of supervisors of each of the counties into which any such subway will reach shall first agree as to what portions of the expense of such subway will be paid by each county. Thereafter the board of each county may take the proceedings it considers proper under the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1435.

Such a subway shall not be constructed under any navigable body of water forming the dividing line between counties, unless all the counties into which such subway reaches first authorize such work and also authorize the issue of bonds therefor in the manner provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1436.

Whenever any such proposed subway will reach within the limits of any city, if the governing body of each such city and the board of supervisors of the county in which each such city is situated first so agree, the board of supervisors may call an election and submit to the electors of the county, in the manner provided in this article, the question whether bonds of the county will be issued and sold for the purpose of constructing such a subway in the manner prescribed in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.5. The Care and Protection of County Highways [1450. - 1470.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1450. - 1450.]

1450.

As used in this chapter:

(a) The term “highway” includes all or any part of the entire width of right of way of a county highway, whether or not such entire area is actually used for highway purposes.

(b) The term “encroachment” includes any tower, pole, poleline, pipe, pipeline, driveway, private road, fence, billboard, stand or building, or any structure or object of any kind or character not particularly mentioned in this section, which is placed in, under or over any portion of the highway.

(c) “Public agency” includes any city, public corporation, political subdivision, or district.

(d) “Road commissioner” means the county road commissioner appointed pursuant to Section 2006.

This chapter shall only apply to any works or facilities of any public agency or public utility if such works or facilities are installed pursuant to franchise in, under or over any public highway. This chapter shall not limit the powers and duties vested by law in the Public Utilities Commission of this state, and in the event of any conflict with regard to the powers and duties given the road commissioner in this chapter, those of the Public Utilities Commission shall prevail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 789.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Permit Provisions [1460. - 1470.]

1460.
